scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_oo.yaml
     agajitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagajitoon
     agajitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagajitoon
     agajitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agajitood
     agajitoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egajitood
     agaasadetoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagaasadetoon
     agaasadetoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagaasadetoon
     agaasadetoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagaasadetoon
     agaasadetoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagaasadetoon
     agaasadetoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agaasadetood
     agaasadetoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egaasadetood
     agaasadetoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agaasadetoon
     agaasaatoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagaasaatoon
     agaasaatoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagaasaatoon
     agaasaatoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagaasaatoon
     agaasaatoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagaasaatoon
     agaasaatoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agaasaatood
     agaasaatoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egaasaatood
     agaasaatoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agaasaatoon
     agaasiboodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagaasiboodoon
     agaasiboodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagaasiboodoon
     agaasiboodoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agaasiboodood
     agaasiboodoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egaasiboodood
     agaasiboodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agaasiboodoon
     agaasitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagaasitoon
     agaasitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagaasitoon
     agaasitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagaasitoon
     agaasitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agaasitood
     agaasitoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egaasitood
     agaasitoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agaasitoon 
     agokadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagokadoon
     agokadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagokadoon
     agokadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagokadoon
     agokadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagokadoon
     agokadoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agokadood
     agokadoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egokadood
     agokadoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agokadoon
     agonjidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagonjidoon
     agonjidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagonjidoon
     agonjidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagonjidoon
     agonjidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagonjidoon
     agonjidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agonjidood
     agonjidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egonjidood
     agonjidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agonjidoon 
     agoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagoodoon
     agoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagoodoon
     agoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ndagoodoon
     agoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagoodoon
     agoodoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agoodood
     agoodoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egoodood
     agoodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agoodoon
     agwanaatesidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwanaatesidoon
     agwanaatesidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwanaatesidoon
     agwanaatesidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwanaatesidood
     agwanaatesidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwanaatesidood
     agwanaatesidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwanaatesidoon
     agwanjidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwanjidoon
     agwanjidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwanjidoon
     agwanjidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwanjidood
     agwanjidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwanjidood
     agwanjidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwanjidoon
     agwapidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwapidoon
     agwapidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwapidoon
     agwapidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagwapidoon
     agwapidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwapidoon
     agwapidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwapidood
     agwapidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwapidood
     agwapidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwapidoon 
     agwaabidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwaabidoon
     agwaabidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwaabidoon
     agwaabidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagwaabidoon
     agwaabidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaabidoon
     agwaabidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaabidood
     agwaabidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaabidood
     agwaabidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwaabidoon 
     agwaa'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwaa'oodoon
     agwaa'oodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: odagwaa'oodoon
     agwaa'oodoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaa'oodood
     agwaa'oodoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaa'oodood
     agwaa'oodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwaa'oodoon
     agwaasidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwaasidoon
     agwaasidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaasidoon
     agwaasidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaasidood
     agwaasidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaasidood
     agwaasidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1: agwaasidoon 
     agwaawidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwaawidoon
     agwaawidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaawidoon
     agwaawidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaawidood
     agwaawidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaawidood
     agwaawidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: agwaawidoon
     agwinjidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwinjidoon
     agwinjidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwinjidoon
     agwinjidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwinjidood
     agwinjidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwinjidood
     agwinjidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: agwinjidoon
     ajidagoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indajidagoodoon
     ajidagoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindajidagoodoon
     ajidagoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidajidagoodoon
     ajidagoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odajidagoodoon
     ajidagoodoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ajidagoodood
     ajidagoodoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ejidagoodood
     ajidagoodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: ajidagoodoon
     akawaatoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindakawaatoon
     akawaatoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakawaatoon
     akawaatoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: akawaatood
     akawaatoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ekawaatood
     akooshkinatoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ndakooshkinatoon
     akooshkinatoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odakooshkinatoon
     akooshkinatoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: akooshkinatood
     akooshkinatoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: ekooshkinatood
     akooshkinatoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: akooshkinatoon
     akootoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indakootoon
     akootoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindakootoon
     akootoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidakootoon
     akootoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odakootoon
     akootoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: akootood
     akootoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ekootood
     akootoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: akootoon 
     akwaakoboodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindakwaakoboodoon
     akwaakoboodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: odakwaakoboodoon
     akwaakoboodoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: akwaakoboodood
     akwaakoboodoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ekwaakoboodood
     akwaakoboodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: akwaakoboodoon
     akwaakotoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindakwaakotoon
     akwaakotoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odakwaakotoon
     akwaakotoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: akwaakotood
     akwaakotoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ekwaakotood
     akwaakotoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: akwaakotoon
     akwaandawewidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindakwaandawewidoon 
     akwaandawewidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odakwaandawewidoon 
     akwaandawewidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: akwaandawewidood
     akwaandawewidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ekwaandawewidood
     akwaandawewidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: akwaandawewidoon
     andobidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandobidoon
     andobidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandobidoon
     andobidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andobidood
     andobidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endobidood
     andobidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andobidoon
     angotoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indangotoon
     angotoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindangotoon
     angotoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidangotoon
     angotoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odangotoon
     angotoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: angotood
     angotoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: engotood
     angotoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: angotoon 
     anibesidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanibesidoon
     anibesidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanibesidoon
     anibesidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: anibesidood
     anibesidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enibesidood
     anibesidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: anibesidoon
     anima'adoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanima'adoon
     anima'adoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindanima'adoon
     anima'adoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidanima'adoon
     anima'adoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanima'adoon
     anima'adoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: anima'oodood
     anima'adoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enima'oodood
     anima'adoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: anima'oodoon
     anima'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanima'oodoon
     anima'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindanima'oodoon
     anima'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidanima'oodoon
     anima'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanima'oodoon
     anima'oodoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: anima'oodood
     anima'oodoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enima'oodood
     anima'oodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: anima'oodoon
     animaawadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanimaawadoon
     animaawadoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: animaawadood
     animaawadoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enimaawadood
     animaawadoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: animaawadoon
     animibizonitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanimibizonitoon
     animibizonitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindanimibizonitoon
     animibizonitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidanimibizonitoon
     animibizonitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanimibizonitoon
     animibizonitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: animibizonitood
     animibizonitoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enimibizonitood
     animibizonitoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: animibizonitoon
     animikosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanimikosidoon
     animikosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindanimikosidoon
     animikosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidanimikosidoon
     animikosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanimikosidoon
     animikosidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: animikosidood
     animikosidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enimikosidood
     animikosidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: animikosidoon 
     animikwagoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanimikwagoodoon
     animikwagoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanimikwagoodoon
     animikwagoodoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: animikwagoodood
     animikwagoodoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enimikwagoodood
     animikwagoodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: animikwagoodoon
     animiwidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanimiwidoon
     animiwidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindanimiwidoon
     animiwidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidanimiwidoon
     animiwidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanimiwidoon
     animiwidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: animiwidood
     animiwidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: animiwidoon 
     anishinaabewisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanishinaabewisidoon
     anishinaabewisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindanishinaabewisidoon
     anishinaabewisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidanishinaabewisidoon
     anishinaabewisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanishinaabewisidoon
     anishinaabewisidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: anishinaabewisidood
     anishinaabewisidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enishinaabewisidood
     anishinaabewisidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: anishinaabewisidoon
     apagidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indapagidoon
     apagidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindapagidoon
     apagidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidapagidoon
     apagidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odapagidoon
     apagidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: apagidood
     apagidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: epagidood
     apagidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: apagidoon
     apisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indapisidoon
     apisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindapisidoon
     apisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidapisidoon
     apisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odapisidoon
     apisidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: apisidood
     apisidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: episidood
     apisidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: apisidoon 
     apiichisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindapiichisidoon
     apiichisidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odapiichisidoon
     apiichisidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: apiichisidood
     apiichisidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: epiichisidood
